Arkansas, session 2025, HB1441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-21-206(4), concerning powers and duties
of the State Surveyor, is amended to read as follows:
(4) To extend throughout the state a triangulation and leveling
net of precision whereby the Arkansas Plane Coordinate System 1983, § 15-21-
301 et seq., already initiated in this state by the National Geodetic Survey
may be made to cover to the necessary extent those areas of the state that do
not now have enough geodetic control stations to permit the general use of
the system by land surveyors and others;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-21-301 is amended to read as follows:
15-21-301. Designation of system.
The system of plane coordinates which has been established by the
National Geodetic Survey or its successors, based on the National Spatial
Reference System or its successors, and known as the State Plane Coordinate
System or its successors for defining and stating the positions or locations
of points on the surface of the earth within the State of Arkansas is to
shall be known and designated as the “Arkansas Plane Coordinate System 1983”.

*CRH111*
02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1441
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-21-302 — 15-21-303 are repealed.
15-21-302. Creation of zones.
(a) For the purpose of the use of the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983
the state is divided into a “North Zone” and a “South Zone”.
(b) The area now included in the following counties shall constitute
the North Zone: Baxter, Benton, Boone, Carroll, Clay, Cleburne, Conway,
Craighead, Crawford, Crittenden, Cross, Faulkner, Franklin, Fulton, Greene,
Independence, Izard, Jackson, Johnson, Lawrence, Logan, Madison, Marion,
Mississippi, Newton, Perry, Poinsett, Pope, Pulaski, Randolph, Scott, Searcy,
Sebastian, Sharp, St. Francis, Stone, Van Buren, Washington, White, Woodruff,
and Yell.
(c) The area now included in the following counties shall constitute
the South Zone: Arkansas, Ashley, Bradley, Calhoun, Chicot, Clark, Cleveland,
Columbia, Dallas, Desha, Drew, Garland, Grant, Hempstead, Hot Spring, Howard,
Jefferson, Lafayette, Lee, Lincoln, Little River, Lonoke, Miller, Monroe,
Montgomery, Nevada, Ouachita, Phillips, Pike, Polk, Prairie, Saline, Sevier,
and Union.

15-21-303. Designations within zones.
(a) As established for use in the North Zone, the Arkansas Coordinate
System 1983 shall be named and in any land description in which it is used it
shall be designated the “Arkansas Coordinate System 1983, North Zone”.
(b) As established for use in the South Zone, the Arkansas Coordinate
System 1983 shall be named and in any land description in which it is used it
shall be designated the “Arkansas Coordinate System 1983, South Zone”.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 15-21-304 is amended to read as follows:
15-21-304. Land lying in both multiple zones.
When any tract of land to be defined by a single description extends
from one (1) coordinate zone into the other of the coordinate zones
established by § 15-21-302, the positions of all points on its boundaries may
be referred to either one (1) of the two (2) zones, the zone which is used
being specifically named in the description.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 15-21-305 is amended to read as follows:
15-21-305. Coordinates.
02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1441
(a)(1) The plane coordinates of a point on the earth's surface to be
used in expressing the geographic position or location of such a the point in
the appropriate zone of the Arkansas Plane Coordinate System 1983 shall
consist of two (2) distances, expressed in feet and decimals of a foot or
meters and decimals of a meter.
(2) When the value expressed under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section is in feet, one (1) foot shall equal three thousand forty-eight ten-
thousandths (0.3048) meters exactly.
(b) One (1) of these distances, to be known as the “east(x)-
coordinate”, shall give the position in the east-and-west direction, and the
other, to be known as the “north(y)-coordinate”, shall give the position in a
north-and-south direction.
(c) These coordinates shall be made to depend upon and conform to the
coordinates on the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 of the triangulation and
traverse stations of the National Geodetic Survey within the State of
Arkansas as those coordinates have been determined by the National Geodetic
Survey.
(d)(1) The official conversion for meters to feet shall be the United
States survey foot.
(2)(A) Meters shall be converted to United States survey feet by
multiplying the number of meters by 39.37 and dividing that result by twelve
(12).
(B) One (1) meter shall equal 39.37 inches.
(C) 3.280833333 United States survey feet are equal to one
(1) meter.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 15-21-306 is repealed.
15-21-306. Technical definition of system — Marking of coordinates on
ground.
(a) For purposes of more precisely defining the Arkansas Coordinate
System 1983, the following definition by the National Geodetic Survey is
adopted:
(1)(A) The Arkansas Coordinate System 1983, North Zone, is a
Lambert conformal projection of the North American Datum of 1983 (NAD83),
having standard parallels at north latitudes of thirty-four degrees fifty-six
minutes (34° 56′ north) and thirty-six degrees fourteen minutes (36° 14′
02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1441
north), along which parallels the scale shall be exact.
(B) The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of
the meridian ninety-two degrees zero minutes west of Greenwich (92° 00′ west)
and the parallel thirty-four degrees twenty minutes north latitude (34° 20′
north). This origin is given the coordinates: East equals four hundred
thousand meters (400,000 m.) and north equals zero meters (0.0 m.); and
(2)(A) The Arkansas Coordinate System 1983, South Zone, is a
Lambert conformal projection of the North American Datum of 1983 (NAD83),
having standard parallels at north latitudes of thirty-three degrees eighteen
minutes (33° 18′ north) and thirty-four degrees forty minutes (34° 40′ north),
along which parallels the scale shall be exact.
(B) The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of
the meridian ninety-two degrees zero minutes west of Greenwich (92° 0′ west)
and the parallel thirty-two degrees forty minutes north latitude (32° 40′
north). This origin is given the coordinates: East equals four hundred
thousand meters (400,000 m.) and north equals four hundred thousand meters
(400,000 m.).
(b) The position of Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 shall be marked on
the ground by triangulation or traverse stations established in conformity
with standards adopted by the National Geodetic Survey for first-order and
second-order work, whose geodetic positions have been rigidly adjusted on the
North American Datum of 1983 and whose coordinates have been computed on the
system herein defined. Any such station may be used for establishing a survey
connection with the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 15-21-308 is repealed.
15-21-308. References to system on maps and surveys.
The use of the term “Arkansas Coordinate System 1983” on any map,
report of survey, or other document shall be limited to coordinates based on
the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 as defined in this subchapter.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code §§ 15-21-309 and 15-21-310 are amended to
read as follows:
15-21-309. Description by coordinates supplemental to references to
public land surveys.
Wherever coordinates based on the Arkansas Plane Coordinate System 1983
02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1441
are used to describe any tract of land which in the same document is also
described by reference to any subdivision, line, or other corner of the
United States Public Land Survey, the description by the coordinates shall be
construed as supplemental to the basic description of such subdivision, line,
or corner contained in the official plats and field notes filed of record,
and in the event of any conflict, the description by reference to the
subdivision, line, or corner of the United States Public Land Survey shall
prevail over the description by coordinates.

15-21-310. Reliance on system not required.
Nothing contained in this subchapter shall require any purchaser or
mortgagee to rely on the description, any part of which depends exclusively
upon the Arkansas Plane Coordinate System 1983.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 21, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-21-311. Superseded legacy Arkansas plane coordinate systems.
(a)(1) Two (2) plane coordinate systems were previously defined in
statute:
(A) The most recent based on the North American Datum of
1983; and
(B) The prior version based on the North American Datum of
1927.
(2) Both of the plane coordinate systems referenced in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section are superseded by the Arkansas Plane
Coordinate System under § 15-21-301.
(3) If either of the legacy systems referenced in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section are used, the legacy system shall be referred to as
either of the following to clearly distinguish the legacy systems from each
other and the Arkansas Plane Coordinate System:
(A) Arkansas Coordinate System 1983; or
(B) Arkansas Coordinate System 1927.
(b)(1) For both the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 and the Arkansas
Coordinate System 1927, if a coordinate value is expressed in feet, the
United States survey foot shall be used.
(2) To calculate the United States survey foot required under
02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1441
subdivision (b)(1) of this section, one (1) foot equals 1200/3937 meters
exactly.
(c)(1)(A) Both the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 and the Arkansas
Coordinate System 1927 are divided into a north and south zone.
(B) The north zone is assigned code 0301, and the south
zone is assigned code 0302.
(2) The zones in both systems are Lambert conformal conic map
projections.
(d)(1)(A) Both the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 and the Arkansas
Coordinate System 1927 north zone have standard parallels at north latitudes
of thirty-four degrees fifty-six minutes (34° 56′ north) and thirty-six
degrees fourteen minutes (36° 14′ north), along which parallels the scale is
exact.
(B) The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of
the meridian ninety-two degrees zero minutes west of Greenwich (92° 00′ west)
and the parallel thirty-four degrees twenty minutes north latitude (34° 20′
north).
(C) For the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983, this origin
is given the coordinates of east equals four hundred thousand meters (400,000
m.) and north equals zero meters (0.0 m.).
(D) For the Arkansas Coordinate System 1927, this origin
is given the coordinates x equals two million United States survey feet
(2,000,000′) and y equals zero (0′) United States survey feet.
(2)(A) Both the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983 and the Arkansas
Coordinate System 1927 south zone have standard parallels at north latitudes
of thirty-three degrees eighteen minutes (33° 18′ north) and thirty-four
degrees forty minutes (34° 46′ north), along which parallels the scale shall
be exact.
(B) The origin of coordinates is at the intersection of
the meridian ninety-two degrees zero minutes west of Greenwich (92° 0′ west)
and the parallel thirty-two degrees forty minutes north latitude (32° 40′
north).
(C) For the Arkansas Coordinate System 1983, the origin is
given the coordinates of east equals four hundred thousand meters (400,000
m.), and north equals four hundred thousand meters (400,000 m.).
(D) For the Arkansas Coordinate System 1927, the origin is
02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 HB1441
given the coordinates x equals two million United States survey feet
(2,000,000′), and y equals zero (0′) United States survey feet.
(e) The Arkansas Coordinate System of 1983 north zone consists of the
following counties listed from west to east, and all counties to the north:
(1) Scott County;
(2) Yell County;
(3) Perry County;
(4) Pulaski County;
(5) Faulkner County;
(6) White County;
(7) Woodruff County;
(8) St. Francis County; and
(9) Crittenden County.
(f) The Arkansas Coordinate System of 1983 south zone consists of the
following counties listed from west to east, and all counties to the south:
(1) Polk County;
(2) Montgomery County;
(3) Garland County;
(4) Saline County;
(5) Grant County;
(6) Jefferson County;
(7) Lonoke County;
(8) Prairie County;
(9) Monroe County; and
(10) Lee County.
(g) The Arkansas Coordinate System of 1927 north zone and south zone
consist of the same counties as the Arkansas Coordinate System of 1983
provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, except that Pulaski
County is in the south zone rather than the north zone.

/s/S. Meeks





02-13-2025 10:31:31 CRH111